Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.030

Board of governors.

There is hereby constituted a board of governors of the state bar which shall consist of not more than fifteen members, to include: The president of the state bar elected as provided by the bylaws of the association, one member from each congressional district now or hereafter existing in the state elected by secret ballot by mail by the active members residing therein, and such additional members elected as provided by the bylaws of the association. The members of the board of governors shall hold office for three years and until their successors are elected and qualified. Any vacancies in the board of governors shall be filled by the continuing members of the board until the next election, held in accordance with the bylaws of the association.

The board shall not be deemed to be unlawfully constituted and a member of the board shall not be deemed ineligible to serve the remainder of the member's unexpired term on the board solely by reason of the establishment of new or revised boundaries for congressional districts.

[ 1982 1st ex.s. c 30 s 1; 1972 ex.s. c 66 s 1; 1933 c 94 s 5; RRS s 138-5.]